Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB711.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Autism." A neurodevelopmental disorder AUTISM SPECTRUM DISORDER AS defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition (DSM-5) that includes autistic <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 disorder, Asperger's disorder and autism spectrum disorder. , TEXT REVISIONS (DSM-5-TR).* * *"Community home for individuals with an intellectual disability or autism." As follows:(1) A building or separate dwelling unit in which residential care is provided to one or more individuals with an intellectual disability or autism.(2) The term does not include:(i) A private home of individuals providing care to a relative with an intellectual disability or autism.(ii) A residential facility operated by the Department of Human Services.(iii) An intermediate care facility for individuals with an intellectual disability licensed by the Department of Human Services or an intermediate care facility for individuals with a related condition.(iv) A AN APPROVED foster family care home licensed by the Office of Children, Youth and Families of the Department of Human Services RESIDENCE that serves only foster care children.(v) A summer camp.(vi) A LICENSED facility serving exclusively personal care home, drug and alcohol, mental health or domiciliary care residents.(vii) A residential home for three or fewer individuals with an intellectual disability or autism who are 18 years of age or older and who need a yearly average of 30 hours or less direct staff contact per week per home.20250HB0711PN3171 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) A child residential facility which serves exclusively children.* * *"Intellectual disability." Subaverage general intellectual functioning which originates during the developmental period and is associated with impairment of one or more of the following:(1) Maturation.(2) Learning.(3) Social adjustment.* * *"Relative." A parent, child, stepparent, stepchild, grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, half-brother, half-sister, aunt, uncle, niece or nephew.* * *Section 2. Section 901(g) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 901. Exemptions.* * *(g) Automatic fire sprinkler systems in one-family and two-family dwellings.--* * *(1.1) If a one-family or two-family dwelling is utilized as a community home for individuals with an intellectual disability or autism, the dwelling shall not be subject to heightened automatic sprinkler requirements for Group R-3 and Group R-4 occupancies of the International Building Code (2018 edition).* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0711PN3171 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829